Nevada, session 83, AB53.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of trustees of each school district shall adopt a
policy to require each elementary school in the school district to
provide recess each school day to pupils in kindergarten and
grades 1 to 5, inclusive.
2. The governing body of each charter school that provides
instruction to pupils in kindergarten or grade 1, 2, 3, 4 or 5 shall
adopt a policy to require each such school to provide recess each
school day to each such pupil.
3. The policy adopted pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 must
include, without limitation:
(a) A requirement that each elementary school within the
school district or the charter school, as applicable, provide at least
20 minutes of outdoor recess each school day to each pupil in
kindergarten or grade 1, 2, 3, 4 or 5;
(b) A provision for an exemption if a pupil is unable to
participate in recess because of an illness or a disability or is
otherwise physically unable to participate in recess;
(c) A provision prohibiting a teacher, an administrator or any
other person from denying a pupil the outdoor recess required
pursuant to paragraph (a) for reasons relating to behavior or
academics, except when:
(1) An academic goal cannot reasonably be achieved
through other means; or
(2) The safety or welfare of the pupil or other persons
cannot reasonably be protected through other means; and
(d) A provision for substituting appropriate indoor activities
for the outdoor recess required pursuant to paragraph (a) in the
event that weather or other conditions make outdoor recess unsafe
or otherwise inappropriate.
Sec. 2. Chapter 389 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school may authorize a pupil enrolled in a junior
high or middle school or a high school who completes an outdoor
recreational activity that is approved pursuant to subsection 2 to
receive credit toward the total number of credits required for
promotion to high school or graduation from high school, as
applicable. Any credit earned for completing an outdoor
recreational activity pursuant to this section must be applied
towards the pupil’s elective course credit.
-
*AB53*

– 3 –
2. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school may approve for credit pursuant to
subsection 1 an outdoor recreational activity that:
(a) Is completed outside of school hours;
(b) Requires a pupil to spend a significant amount of time
outdoors; and
(c) Teaches the pupil skills that are relevant to outdoor
education which may include, without limitation:
(1) Identifying plants and animals native to this State;
(2) Building trails;
(3) Restoring natural habitats;
(4) Outdoor survival skills;
(5) Outdoor sportsmanship skills, including, without
limitation, hiking and archery; and
(6) Bird watching.
3. If the board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school approves outdoor recreational activities
for credit pursuant to subsection 1, the board of trustees or
governing body, as applicable, shall prescribe the:
(a) Maximum amount of total credits that a pupil may earn for
completing outdoor recreational activities;
(b) Rules regarding how a pupil may apply for such credit
upon the completion of an approved outdoor recreational activity;
and
(c) Procedures for obtaining the consent of a parent or legal
guardian of a pupil before the pupil may participate in an outdoor
recreational activity for which credit will be granted.
4. This section shall not be construed to require the board of
trustees of a school district or the governing body of a charter
school to provide, facilitate or spend money to provide, facilitate or
sponsor any outdoor recreational activity.
Sec. 3. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to this act.
Sec. 4. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1, 2 and 3 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB53*